Hawaii statutes.
[§501-244] Assignment of leasehold time
share interest. Any instrument which first assigns or otherwise conveys a
leasehold time share interest shall refer to the land court document number of
the apartment lease or the most recent assignment of the whole thereof,
whichever is later. Any subsequent instrument of assignment or conveyance
shall refer to the book and page or bureau of conveyances document number of
the prior instrument of assignment or conveyance for the leasehold time share
interest acquired. [L 1998, c 219, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next